California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) For purposes of this section, the “applicable amount” shall be equal to 50 percent of the “net tax” (as defined in Section 17039) before application of any credits.

(d) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 17039 that is not allowed due to application of this section shall remain a credit
 carryover amount under this part.

(e) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit (or any portion thereof) was not allowed.

(f) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) the credits listed in subdivision (b) shall be required to be applied before any business credits, as limited by subdivision (a), are applied.

(g) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a taxpayer with net business income of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the taxable year. For purposes of this subdivision, business income means:

(1) Income from a trade or business, whether conducted by
 the taxpayer or by a pasthrough entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “passthrough entity” means a partnership or an “S” corporation.

(2) Income from rental activity.

(3) Income attributable to a farming business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part
 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) For purposes of this section, “business credit” means a credit allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041) other than the following credits:

(1) The credit allowed by Section 17052 (relating to credit for earned income).

(2) The credit allowed by Section 17052.1 (relating to credit for young child).

(3) The credit allowed by Section 17052.6 (relating to credit for household and dependent care).

(4) The credit allowed by Section 17052.25 (relating to credit for adoption costs).

(5) The credit allowed by Section 17053.5 (relating to renter’s tax credit).

(6) The credit allowed by Section 17054 (relating to credit for personal exemption).

(7) The credit allowed by Section 17054.5 (relating to credit for qualified joint custody head of household and a
 qualified taxpayer with a dependent parent).

(8) The credit allowed by Section 17054.7 (relating to credit for qualified senior head of household).

(9) The credit allowed by Section 17058 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(10) The credit allowed by Section 17061 (relating to refunds pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code).

(d) Any amounts included in an election pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, or 23698 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 17039 that is not allowed due to application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(f) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit or any portion thereof was not allowed.

(g) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), the credits listed in subdivision (c) shall be applied after any business credits, as limited by subdivision (a) or (b), are applied.

(h) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination,
 rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 7.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or
 Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) For purposes of this section, “business credit” means a credit allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041) other than the following credits:

(1) The credit allowed by Section 17052 (relating to credit for earned income).

(2) The credit allowed by Section 17052.1 (relating to credit for young child).

(3) The credit allowed by Section 17052.2 (relating to credit for foster youth).

(4) The credit allowed by Section 17052.6 (relating to credit for household and dependent care).

(5) The credit allowed by Section 17052.10 or 17052.11 (relating to the elective tax under the Small Business Relief Act).

(6) The credit allowed by Section 17052.25 (relating to credit for adoption costs).

(7) The credit allowed by Section 17053.5 (relating to renter’s tax
 credit).

(8) The credit allowed by Section 17054 (relating to credit for personal exemption).

(9) The credit allowed by Section 17054.5 (relating to credit for qualified joint custody head of household and a qualified taxpayer with a dependent parent).

(10) The credit allowed by Section 17054.7 (relating to credit for qualified senior head of household).

(11) The credit allowed by Section 17058 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(12) The credit allowed by Section 17061 (relating to refunds pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code).

(d) Any annual refundable credit amount included in an election pursuant to
 Section 17039.5 is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) Notwithstanding the operative date in subdivision (a), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, if an election is made pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1, both the credit allowed against the “net tax” under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1 and the annual refundable amount calculated under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1 shall not be included in the limitation set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(f) Any amounts included in an election pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 17053.98.1, 23685, 23695, 23698, or 23698.1 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the
 five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(g) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, any credit, or portion thereof, sold pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17053.95, 17053.98, or 17053.98.1, paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 23695 or 23698, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 23698.1, is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(h) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 17039 that is not allowed due to application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(i) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit or any portion thereof was not allowed.

(j) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), the credits listed in subdivision (c) shall be applied after any business credits, as limited by subdivision (a) or (b), are applied.

(k) For taxpayers that make the election under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1, any amount of refundable credits pursuant to that subdivision over the five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) limitation under this section shall be allowed in the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2027.

 (l) If a taxpayer makes the election under both Section 17039.5 and subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1 with respect to the credit amount under Section 17053.98.1, the total amount of credit allowed pursuant to both elections shall not exceed the credit amount allowed under subdivision (a) of Section 17053.98.1.

(m) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(n) The amendments made to this section by Section 6 of Chapter 17 of the Statutes of 2025 shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

(o) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.5.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, a taxpayer may make an election to receive an annual refundable credit amount of qualified credits for each taxable year to be allowed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) In each taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable credit amount shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” computed under this part for the taxable year, and the excess, if any, shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account to the taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Annual refundable credit amount” means 20 percent of the
 credit amount for the taxable year.

(2) (A) “Credit amount” means the amount of the qualified credits that would have otherwise been available to reduce net tax in the taxable year of the election but for the limitation under Section 17039.4.

(B) In the case of a pass-thru entity, the “credit amount” refers to the pro rata share or distributive share of the credit passed through to the partner or shareholder of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership, “S” corporation, or limited liability company treated as a partnership.

(C) In the case of an assigned credit, the “credit amount” refers to the credit amount that was assigned to the taxpayer.

(D) In the case of
 taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the “credit amount” refers to the credit amount of all members of the combined report.

(3) “Qualified credits” means the credits subject to the limitation under Section 17039.4.

(4) “Refundable period” means the first five consecutive taxable years beginning the third taxable year after the taxable year that the taxpayer makes an election under this section.

(c) No portion of the annual refundable credit amount can be assigned to another taxpayer.

(d) The following shall apply for purposes of the election pursuant to this section:

(1) The taxpayer may make an election for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.

(2) Each election shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year that the election is made in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) (1) Any adjustment of an annual refundable credit amount shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A valid election as required under this section was not made.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board determines that credit
 amount overstatements in any taxable year resulted in an overstatement in any carryover amount or an overstatement of any refundable credit amount.

(C) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the credit amount was overstated as a result of any subsequent adjustment in the amount of net tax, including, but not limited to, an audit adjustment or claim for refund.

(2) Any amount of tax due resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(f) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 23.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2030, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, by more than 70 percent or five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is greater.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this
 part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2030, the total of all business credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041), including the carryover of any business credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than 70 percent or five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is greater.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business credit” means a credit allowable under any provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041) other than the following credits:

(1) The credit allowed by Section 17052 (relating to credit for earned income).

(2) The credit allowed by Section 17052.1 (relating to credit for young child).

(3) The credit allowed by Section 17052.2 (relating to credit for foster youth).

(4) The credit allowed by Section 17052.6 (relating to credit for household and dependent care).

(5) The credit allowed by Section 17052.10 or 17052.11 (relating to the elective tax under the Small Business Relief Act).

(6) The credit allowed by Section 17052.25 (relating to credit for adoption costs).

(7) The credit allowed by
 Section 17053.5 (relating to renter’s tax credit).

(8) The credit allowed by Section 17054 (relating to credit for personal exemption).

(9) The credit allowed by Section 17054.5 (relating to credit for qualified joint custody head of household and a qualified taxpayer with a dependent parent).

(10) The credit allowed by Section 17054.7 (relating to credit for qualified senior head of household).

(11) The credit allowed by Section 17058 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(12) The credit allowed by Section 17061 (relating to refunds pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code).

(d) Any amounts included in an election
 pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 17053.98.1, 23685, 23695, 23698, or 23698.1 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) Any annual refundable credit amount included in an election pursuant to Section 17039.5 is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(f) If an election is made pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1, both the credit allowed against the “net tax” under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1 and the annual refundable amount calculated under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.1 shall not be included in the limitation set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section.

(g) Any credit, or portion thereof, sold pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17053.95, 17053.98, or 17053.98.1, paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 23695 or 23698, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 23698.1, is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(h) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 17039 that is not allowed due to application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(i) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), the credits listed in subdivision (c) shall be applied after any business credits, as limited by subdivision (a) or (b), are applied.

(j) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 2.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [17041. - 17061.]

17041.

(a) (1) There shall be imposed for each taxable year upon the entire taxable income of every resident of this state who is not a part-year resident, except the head of a household as defined in Section 17042, taxes in the following amounts and at the following rates upon the amount of taxable income computed for the taxable year as if the
 resident were a resident of this state for the entire taxable year and for all prior taxable years for any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions:If the taxable income is:The tax is:Not over $3,650 1% of the taxable incomeOver $3,650 but notover $8,650 
$36.50 plus 2% of the excess
over $3,650Over $8,650 but notover $13,650 
$136.50 plus 4% of the excess
over $8,650Over $13,650 but notover $18,950 
$336.50 plus 6% of the excess
over $13,650Over $18,950 but notover $23,950 
$654.50 plus 8% of the excess
over $18,950Over $23,950 $1,054.50 plus 9.3% of the excess
over $23,950(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
 and before January 1, 2011, the percentages specified in the table in paragraph (1) shall be increased by adding 0.25 percent to each percentage.

(b) (1) There shall be imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income of every nonresident or part-year resident, except the head of a household as defined in Section 17042, a tax as calculated in paragraph (2).

(2) The tax imposed under paragraph (1) shall be calculated by multiplying the “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident,” as defined in subdivision (i), by a rate (expressed as a percentage) equal to the tax computed under subdivision (a) on the entire taxable income of the nonresident or part-year resident as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for the taxable year and as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for all
 prior taxable years for any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions, divided by the amount of that income.

(c) (1) There shall be imposed for each taxable year upon the entire taxable income of every resident of this state who is not a part-year resident for that taxable year, when the resident is the head of a household, as defined in Section 17042, taxes in the following amounts and at the following rates upon the amount of taxable income computed for the taxable year as if the resident were a resident of the state for the entire taxable year and for all prior taxable years for carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions:If the taxable income is:The tax is:Not over $7,300 1% of the taxable incomeOver $7,300 but notover $17,300 
$73 plus 2% of the excess
over $7,300Over $17,300 but notover $22,300 
$273 plus 4% of the excess
over $17,300Over $22,300 but notover $27,600 
$473 plus 6% of the excess
over $22,300Over $27,600 but notover $32,600 
$791 plus 8% of the excess
over $27,600Over $32,600 $1,191 plus 9.3% of the excess
over $32,600(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2011, the percentages specified in the table in paragraph (1) shall be increased by adding 0.25 percent to each percentage.

(d) (1) There shall be imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income of every nonresident or part-year resident when the nonresident or part-year
 resident is the head of a household, as defined in Section 17042, a tax as calculated in paragraph (2).

(2) The tax imposed under paragraph (1) shall be calculated by multiplying the “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident,” as defined in subdivision (i), by a rate (expressed as a percentage) equal to the tax computed under subdivision (c) on the entire taxable income of the nonresident or part-year resident as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for the taxable year and as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for all prior taxable years for any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions, divided by the amount of that income.

(e) There shall be imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income of every estate, trust, or common trust fund taxes equal to the
 amount computed under subdivision (a) for an individual having the same amount of taxable income.

(f) The tax imposed by this part is not a surtax.

(g) (1) Section 1(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain unearned income of children taxed as if parent’s income, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 1(g)(7)(B)(ii)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified, for purposes of this part, by substituting “1 percent” for “10 percent.”

(h) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the income tax brackets prescribed in subdivisions (a) and (c). That computation shall be made as follows:

(1) The California Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall do both of the following:

(A) Compute an inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and dividing the result by 100.

(B) Multiply the preceding taxable year income tax brackets by the inflation adjustment factor determined in subparagraph (A) and round off the resulting products to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(i) (1) For purposes of this part, the term “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” includes each of the following:

(A) For any part of the taxable year during which the taxpayer was a resident of this state (as defined by Section 17014), all items of gross income and all deductions, regardless of source.

(B) For any part of the taxable year during which the taxpayer was not a resident of this state, gross income and deductions derived from sources within this state, determined in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17301) and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951).

(2) For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1), the amount of any net operating loss sustained in any taxable year during any part of which
 the taxpayer was not a resident of this state shall be limited to the sum of the following:

(A) The amount of the loss attributable to the part of the taxable year in which the taxpayer was a resident.

(B) The amount of the loss which, during the part of the taxable year the taxpayer is not a resident, is attributable to California source income and deductions allowable in arriving at taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident.

(3) For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1), any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions shall only be includable or allowable to the extent that the carryover item, deferred income, suspended loss, or suspended deduction was derived from sources within this state, calculated as if the
 nonresident or part-year resident, for the portion of the year he or she was a nonresident, had been a nonresident for all prior years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 5.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: This section was amended on June 8, 1982, by initiative Prop. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.5.

Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, regulation, rule or decision to the contrary, no city, county, city and county, governmental subdivision, district, public and quasi-public corporation, municipal corporation, whether incorporated or not or whether chartered or not, shall levy or collect or cause to be levied or collected any tax upon the income, or any part thereof, of any person, resident or nonresident.

This section shall not be construed so as to prohibit the levy or collection of any otherwise authorized license tax upon a business measured by or according to gross
 receipts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1319.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.

Section 2(b) and (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definitions of head of household and certain married individuals living apart, respectively, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 9.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17043.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2005, in addition to any other taxes imposed by this part, an additional tax shall be imposed at the rate of 1 percent on that portion of a taxpayer’s taxable income in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000). 

(b) For purposes of applying Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2, the tax imposed under this section shall be treated as
 if imposed under Section 17041. 

(c) The following shall not apply to the tax imposed by this section: 

(1) The provisions of Section 17039, relating to the allowance of credits. 

(2) The provisions of Section 17041, relating to filing status and recomputation of the income tax brackets. 

(3) The provisions of Section 17045, relating to joint returns.

(History: Added November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 12.   Operative January 1, 2005, pursuant to Sec. 16 of Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

17045.

In the case of a joint return of spouses under Section 18521, the tax imposed by Section 17041 shall be twice the tax which would be imposed if the taxable income were cut in one-half.

For purposes of this section, a return of a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046) shall be treated as a joint return of spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 97.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17046.

For purposes of this part, “surviving spouse” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 2(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

17048.

(a) In lieu of the tax imposed under Section 17041, individuals with taxable income of such amounts as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, shall compute their taxes under tax tables prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. The tax tables shall reflect the tax imposed under Section 17041 in income progressions of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), giving effect to the marital or other status of the individual. For purposes of this part, the tax imposed by this section shall be treated as tax imposed by Section 17041.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) An individual to whom subdivision (b) of Section 17504 (relating to the tax on lump-sum distributions) applies for the taxable year.

(2) An individual making a return under Section 443(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code for a period of less than 12 months on account of a change in annual accounting period.

(3) An estate or trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1170, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17049.

(a) If an item of income was included in the gross income of an individual for a preceding taxable year or years because it appeared that the individual had an unrestricted right to that item, a deduction is allowable for the taxable year based on the repayment of the item by the individual during the taxable year, and the amount of that deduction exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000), then the tax imposed by this part for the taxable year on that individual shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) The tax for the taxable year computed with that deduction.

(2) An amount equal to (A) the tax for the taxable year computed without that deduction, minus (B) the decrease in tax under this part for the preceding taxable year or years which would result solely from the exclusion of the item or portion thereof from the gross income required to be shown on the California return of that individual for the preceding taxable year or years.

(b) If the decrease in tax determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for the preceding taxable year or years exceeds the tax imposed for the taxable year, computed without the deduction, that excess shall be considered to be a payment of tax on the last day prescribed for the payment of tax for the taxable year, and shall be refunded or credited in the same
 manner as if it were an overpayment for the taxable year.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any deduction allowable with respect to an item which was included in gross income by reason of the sale or other disposition of stock in trade of the taxpayer, or other property of a kind which would properly have been included in the inventory of the taxpayer if on hand at the close of the prior taxable year, or property held by the taxpayer primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course of his or her trade or business.

(d) If the tax imposed by this part for the taxable year is the amount determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), then the deduction referred to in subdivision (a) shall not be taken into account for any purpose of this part, or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), other than this section.

(e) For purposes of determining whether paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies, in any case where the exclusion referred to in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) results in a net operating loss or capital loss for the prior taxable year, or years, that loss shall, for purposes of computing the decrease in tax for the prior taxable year, or years, under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), be carried over to the same extent and in the same manner as is provided under Section 17276, 17276.1, 17276.2, 17276.4, 17276.5, or 17276.7, or Section 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for California purposes, except that no carryover beyond the taxable year shall be taken into account.

(f) For purposes of this part, the net operating loss or capital loss described in subdivision (e) shall, after the application of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) for the taxable year,
 be taken into account under Section 17276, 17276.1, 17276.2, 17276.4, 17276.5, or 17276.7, or Section 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for California purposes, for taxable years after the taxable year to the same extent and in the same manner as either of the following:

(A) A net operating loss sustained for the taxable year, if paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) applied.

(B) A net operating loss or capital loss sustained for the prior taxable year, or years, if paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applied.

(g) Regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 1341 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply, except to the extent that those regulations conflict with this section, provisions of this part, or with regulations promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, an earned income tax credit in an amount equal to an amount determined in accordance with Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) (A) The amount of the credit determined under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as modified by this section, shall be multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable
 year.

(B) Unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, shall be 0 percent.

(C) The earned income tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the credit.

(b) (1) In lieu of the table prescribed in Section 32(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to percentages, the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children7.65%7.65%1 qualifying child34%34%2 qualifying children40%40%3 or more qualifying children45%45%(2) (A) In lieu of the table prescribed in Section 32(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount
 is:No qualifying children$3,290$3,2901 qualifying child$4,940$4,9402 or more qualifying children$6,935$6,935(B) Section 32(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to joint returns, shall not apply.

(c) (1) Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue
 Code is modified by substituting “this state” for “the United States.”

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “25 but not attained age 65” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “18.”

(3) Section 32(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(A) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “plus” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “and only if such amounts are subject to withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.”

(B) Section
 32(c)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(4) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, paragraph (3) shall not apply and in lieu thereof Section 32(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(A) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “plus” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “and only if such amounts are subject to withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code, plus.”
